__backup__lexica__/postp.lexc
!!!postp.lexc!!!

Multichar_Symbols +Postp

LEXICON Root
Postp;

LEXICON PostpInf
+Postp:0 #;

LEXICON Postp
!Lexical items from corpus
درباره	PostpInf;
را	PostpInf;
همراه	PostpInf;
میان	PostpInf;
کنار	PostpInf;
و	PostpInf;
جلوی	PostpInf;
از	PostpInf;
حدود	PostpInf;
در	PostpInf;
را	PostpInf;
پیش	PostpInf;
رو	PostpInf;
